Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2254
Official test, defined.

Official test shall mean any testing procedure recognized for use in the diagnosis of pseudorabies by (1) the United States Department of Agriculture in 9 C.F.R. part 85, in effect on January 1, 2002, or (2) the department in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to the Pseudorabies Control and Eradication Act.

Laws 1986, LB 775, § 8;

Laws 1990, LB 1004, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 54-2208;

Laws 1991, LB 359, § 19;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 19;

Laws 1996, LB 965, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 64.